Illinois, session 104th, HB2358.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by adding 5Section 7-140.5 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/7-140.5 new)7    Sec. 7-140.5. Benefit commencement. Notwithstanding any 8other provision of this Article, benefit payments under this 9Article, including, but not limited to, disability benefits, 10death benefits, retirement annuities, and surviving spouse 11annuities, must commence no later than 30 days after a person 12has submitted a complete and correct application for a benefit 13to which that person is entitled. 14    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 15Section 8.49 as follows: 16    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)17    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 188 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 19the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 20Act of the 104th General Assembly.